Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-266.01
Expelled student; enrollment in public school; when.

If a student has been expelled from a public school in any school district in any state or from a private, denominational, or parochial school in any state and the student has not completed the terms of the expulsion, the student shall not be permitted to enroll in a public school in any school district until the school board of the district in which enrollment is sought approves, by a majority vote, the enrollment of the student. As a condition of enrollment, the school board may require attendance in an alternative school, class, or educational program pursuant to section 79-266 until the terms of the expulsion are completed. A student expelled from a private, denominational, or parochial school or from a school in another state may not be prohibited from enrolling in a public school district in which the student resides or in which the student has been accepted pursuant to the enrollment option program for any period of time beyond the time limits placed on expulsion pursuant to the Student Discipline Act or for any expulsion for an offense for which expulsion is not authorized for a public school student under the act.

Laws 1999, LB 195, § 2.